src/morphology/clitics.lexc
!! Clitics in Võro
! ---------------

LEXICON K
 FINAL1 ;
+Clt:%>kin%{aä%}q FINAL1 ;
+Clt:%>kiq FINAL1 ;

LEXICON BACK_K
 FINAL1 ;
+Clt:%>kinaq FINAL1 ;
+Clt:%>kiq FINAL1 ;

LEXICON FRONT_K
 FINAL1 ;
+Clt:%>kinäq FINAL1 ;
+Err/Orth+Clt:%>kinaq FINAL1 ; ! THIS WILL NEED WORK 2016-08-27
+Clt:%>kiq FINAL1 ;

! Final lexicon
! =============


LEXICON FINAL1
                        #       ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
